Tennessee, session 114, SB2299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 2, Chapter 1, is amended by adding the
following as a new section:
(a) The secretary of state, in coordination with the coordinator of elections and
all county election commissions, shall create and maintain a publicly accessible,
nonpartisan online candidate information page for each local, state, and federal election.
(b) Each page shall include for every candidate appearing on the ballot for that
election:
(1) The candidate's name as it appears on the ballot;
(2) A candidate-submitted photograph;
(3) A link to the candidate's website, if any, and the candidate's contact
information; and
(4) The candidate's party affiliation, if any.
(c) The candidate information must be displayed uniformly so that all candidates
for the same office are presented with equal formatting, character limits, and
prominence.
(d) The candidate information pages required by subsection (a) must be hosted
on, or directly accessible through, the secretary of state's election information website
and any applications or portals maintained by the secretary of state through which voters
may seek voting information.
(e) The secretary of state shall ensure that the candidate information pages:
SB2299
012102
- 1 -

(1) Are searchable by candidate name, office, district, county, or
municipality; and
(2) Allow a voter to view candidate information pages for all offices on the
voter's ballot.
(f) County election commission websites shall provide direct links to the
corresponding candidate information pages for all elections for which the commission is
administering the election.
(g)
(1) The secretary of state shall establish a secure, statewide candidate
submission page for candidates to upload information required pursuant to
subsection (b).
(2) Candidates are solely responsible for the accuracy of submitted
information.
(h) The secretary of state shall set a deadline for a candidate to submit
information that ensures that the candidate information page is publicly available no later
than fourteen (14) days before early voting for that candidate's election.
(i) After the deadline set pursuant to subsection (h), a candidate may update
submitted information once prior to the beginning of early voting for that election.
(j) Archived candidate information pages must remain publicly accessible for at
least one (1) year following the election.
SECTION 2. For purposes of developing the website and rulemaking, this act takes
effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes
effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012102